Georgia, session 2025_26, HB575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
- 1 -

LC 39 4764S
SECTION 1.
Title 32 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to highways, bridges, and ferries,
is amended in Code Section 32-2-3, relating to development of transportation plans, public
hearings, approval of plans by board, and promulgation of rules and regulations, by revising
paragraphs (3) through (5) of subsection (f) as follows:
"(3) These The public hearings required by this subsection shall be conducted so as to
provide an opportunity for effective participation by interested persons in transportation
policy decisions,; the process of transportation planning, modal selections, and site and
route selection,; and the specific location and design of major transportation facilities.
The At such hearings the various factors involved in the decision or decisions and any
alternative proposals shall be clearly presented so that the persons attending the hearing
in attendance may present their views relating to the decision or decisions which will be
made. The hearing required by this subsection for a facility, site, or project corridor
hearing and the design hearing for the design of a proposed facility or facilities may be
held simultaneously to satisfy the requirements of this subsection.
(4)(A) The department may satisfy the requirements of this subsection for a public
hearing by holding a public hearing or by publishing two notices of opportunity for
providing the opportunity to request a public hearing. Such opportunity to request a
public hearing shall be satisfied upon the publication of notice once a week for two
weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the vicinity of the proposed
undertaking and holding a public hearing if any written requests for such a hearing are
received. The procedure for requesting a public hearing shall be explained in the
notice. The deadline for submission of such a request may not be less than 21 days
after the publication of the first notice of opportunity for public hearing and no less than
14 days after the date of publication of the second notice of opportunity for public
hearing.
- 2 -

LC 39 4764S
(B) A copy of the notice of opportunity for public hearing required by
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall be furnished at the time of publication to the
United States Department of Transportation, the appropriate departments of state
government, and affected local governments and planning agencies. If no requests for
a public hearing are received in response to a notice published pursuant to
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph within the time specified for the submission of
requests in the published notice, the department shall be deemed to have met the
hearing requirements of this subsection.
(C) The opportunity for another public hearing shall be afforded in any case when
When the proposed locations or designs of an undertaking are changed from those
presented in the notices specified in published pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this
paragraph or at a public hearing so as to have a substantially different transportation
service, or different social, economic, or environmental effect, a new public hearing
shall be required. Such public hearing shall be held in accordance with the
requirements of this subsection.
(D) The opportunity for a public hearing shall be afforded in each case in which the
department is in doubt department shall hold a public hearing for an undertaking in any
instance in which federal or state law is unclear as to whether a public hearing is
required.
(5)(A) When a public hearing is to be held pursuant to this subsection, two notices of
such hearing shall be published in print or electronically in a newspaper having general
circulation in the vicinity of the proposed undertaking. The first notice shall be
published no less than 30 days prior to the date of the hearing and the second notice
shall be published no less than five days prior or in the last publication date available
prior to the date of the hearing. The department shall publish a copy of such hearing
notice on its public website no less than 30 days prior to the date of the hearing.
- 3 -

LC 39 4764S
(B) Copies of the notice for public hearing published pursuant to this paragraph shall
be mailed to the United States Department of Transportation, appropriate departments
of state government, and affected local governments and planning agencies."
SECTION 2.
Said title is further amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"32-3-2.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Authorized board' means the executive and administrative body designated in a
condominium instrument or property owners' association instrument as the governing
body of common property as set forth in Article 3 or Article 6 of Chapter 3 of Title 44.
(2) 'Common property' shall include common elements, as such term is defined in Code
Section 44-3-71 and common areas, as such term in defined in Code Section 44-3-221.
(3) 'Declaration' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 44-3-71.
(4) 'Instrument' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 44-3-221.
(5) 'Owner' means any person having interest in property under a declaration or
instrument.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 3 of Title 44 to the contrary, when the
department seeks to acquire any common property, the department shall be authorized to
conduct all phases of such pre-acquisition and acquisition with officers of the authorized
board. Unless specified to the contrary in any recorded instrument or declaration, an
authorized board shall be authorized to convey common property to the department on
behalf of all owners. If, during the pre-acquisition or acquisition phase of common
property authorized by this Code section, the department and authorized board fail to agree
upon the terms of acquisition, the department shall be authorized to bring the authorized
association as a party in any action in lieu of each owner; provided, however, that when an
owner is directly impacted by a proposed acquisition in relation to other owners, such
- 4 -

LC 39 4764S
owner shall be individually named in the action. An owner shall be bound by the judgment
in any action brought by the department against an authorized association pursuant to this
Code section.
(c) Any consideration received by an authorized board in exchange for common property
pursuant to this Code section shall be allocated to each owner pursuant to any ownership
interest set forth in a declaration or instrument."
SECTION 3.
100 Said title is further amended in Code Section 32-6-2, relating to authority of department,
101 counties, and municipalities to regulate parking and parking vehicles or leaving vehicles
102 unattended on right of way of public road on state highway system, by adding a new
103 paragraph to read as follows:
104 "(5) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 11 of Title 40 or Code Section 44-1-13
105 to the contrary, the department shall be authorized to establish and administer a towing
106 and recovery program for the restoration of the right of way and the removal from the
107 right of ways of interstate highways and limited access highways vehicles exceeding
108 16,000 pounds that have been disabled, damaged, abandoned, or wrecked or are
109 otherwise inoperable and which impede the flow of traffic as determined and requested
110 by the department, the Department of Public Safety, local law enforcement, or designated
111 fire department personnel. The authority of the department relating to such towing and
112 recovery program shall include all powers necessary to create and administer such a
113 program, including, but not limited to, the power to adopt all policies, procedures,
114 qualifications, standards, and specifications for towing operators and to establish
115 incentives for towing operators to carry out and effectuate the purposes of this Code
116 section. The removal of any vehicle pursuant to the program authorized by this Code
117 section shall include removal or cleanup of any affected cargo transported or spilled by
- 5 -

LC 39 4764S
118 any vehicle exceeding 16,000 pounds but not any passenger vehicles or personal property
119 thereof."
120 SECTION 4.
121 Said title is further amended in Code Section 32-6-170, relating to payment by department
122 of costs of removal, relocation, and adjustment of utility facilities necessitated by
123 construction of public roads, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
124 "(b) The department is authorized to pay or participate in the payment of the costs of
125 removing, relocating, or making necessary adjustments to any of the following facilities
126 or any component part thereof if they are owned by a public utility that is publicly,
127 privately, or cooperatively owned, without regard to whether such facilities were originally
128 installed upon rights of way of the state highway system, a county road system, or a
129 municipal street system, where the department has made the determination that (i) such
130 payments are in the best interest of the public and necessary in order to expedite the staging
131 of the project; and (ii) the costs of the removal, relocation, or adjustment of such facilities
132 are included as part of the contract between the department and the department's roadway
133 contractor for the project or in a written agreement between the utility and the department,
134 provided that such removal, relocation, or adjustment is made necessary by the
135 construction or maintenance of a public road by the department: water distribution and
136 sanitary sewer facilities and systems for producing, transmitting, or distributing
137 communications, power, electricity, light, heat, gas, steam, waste, and storm water not
138 connected with highway drainage, including fire and police signals, traffic-control devices,
139 and street lighting systems."
140 SECTION 5.
141 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 6 -